Nebraska, session 109, LB476.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB476 LB476
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 76-3701, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
76-3701 Sections 76-3701 to 76-3717 and section 3 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Foreign-owned Real Estate National
Security Act.
Sec. 2. Section 76-3712, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
76-3712 (1) Any person may notify the Department of Agriculture or
the Attorney General of a violation or potential violation of the
Foreign-owned Real Estate National Security Act.
(2) The Department of Agriculture shall investigate violations of
the Foreign-owned Real Estate National Security Act. If the Director of
Agriculture has reasonable suspicion to believe that a violation of the
act has occurred, the director shall refer the suspected violation to the
Attorney General or outside counsel retained by the Department of
Agriculture for enforcement.
(3) The Attorney General or retained outside counsel, upon a
referral by the Director of Agriculture or upon the receipt of any
information from any person that gives the Attorney General or retained
counsel reasonable suspicion to believe that a violation of the Foreign-
owned Real Estate National Security Act has occurred, may issue subpoenas
requiring the appearance of witnesses, the production of documents, and
the giving of relevant testimony. Service of any subpoena shall be made
in the same manner as a subpoena issued by any court in this state.
(4)(a) After investigation, if the Attorney General or retained
outside counsel believes that a violation of the Foreign-owned Real
Estate National Security Act has occurred, the Attorney General or
retained outside counsel shall notify any restricted entity believed to
be committing such violation that such entity may voluntarily divest any
interest in real estate that is the subject of the violation.
(b) The restricted entity shall indicate to the Attorney General or
-2-

LB476 LB476
2025 2025
retained outside counsel whether such entity is voluntarily divesting any
interest in real estate that is the subject of the violation within
thirty days of receiving the notice under subdivision (4)(a) of this
section.
(c) If the restricted entity indicates that it is voluntarily
divesting any interest in real estate that is the subject of the
violation, the restricted entity shall be entitled to a grace period of
one hundred eighty days to voluntarily divest the interest.
(d) The grace period of one hundred eighty days shall begin upon the
end of the thirty-day period under subdivision (4)(b) of this section.
(e) The restricted entity shall not sell or otherwise transfer the
real estate to a person or entity prohibited under the act. A restricted
entity who violates this subdivision shall be subject to a civil penalty
not to exceed fifty thousand dollars per parcel of real estate sold or
otherwise transferred to a person or entity prohibited under the act.
(5) The Attorney General or retained outside counsel shall commence
an action in either the district court in the county in which all or part
of the real estate is located or in the district court of Lancaster
County if:
(a) The restricted entity fails to indicate to the Attorney General
or retained outside counsel that the entity is voluntarily divesting any
interest in real estate that is the subject of the violation within the
thirty-day period under subdivision (4)(b) of this section; or
(b) The restricted entity fails to voluntarily divest any interest
in the real estate that is the subject of the violation within the grace
period of one hundred eighty days.
(6) Upon commencement of an action under this section, the Attorney
General or retained counsel shall:
(a) Promptly record a notice of the pendency of the action in
records with the register of deeds in each county in which all or part of
the real estate is located; and
-3-

LB476 LB476
2025 2025
(b) Serve a copy of the petition by service of process in the same
manner as in civil cases as follows on:
(i) The owner of the real estate if the owner's address is known;
(ii) Any secured party who has registered or filed a lien, mortgage,
or trust deed against the real estate or filed a financing statement
against the real estate as provided by law if the identity of the secured
party can be ascertained by the entity filing the petition by making a
good faith effort to ascertain the identity of the secured party;
(iii) Any other bona fide lienholder or secured party or other
person holding an interest in the real estate if such party is known; and
(iv) Any person residing on the real estate subject to divestment at
the time the petition is filed.
(7) The court shall have power to hear and determine the questions
presented in such case and to declare such real estate to be divested.
The burden is on the state to prove by clear and convincing evidence that
the real estate is subject to divestment under the Foreign-owned Real
Estate National Security Act. If the court finds that the real estate
that is the subject of an action commenced under the act was purchased,
acquired, taken, or held in violation of the act, the court shall enter
an order that:
(a) States the findings of the court;
(b) Orders the divestment of the interest in the real estate of the
person or entity that violated the act;
(c) Notifies the Governor that the title to such real estate is
ordered divested by the decree of the court;
(d) Orders the Attorney General or retained outside counsel to
promptly record a copy of such divestment order with the register of
deeds of each county in which all or part of the real estate is located;
(e) Appoints a receiver subject to sections 25-1081 to 25-1092 to
manage and control the real estate through the final disposition of the
real estate; and
-4-

LB476 LB476
2025 2025
(f) Authorizes the proceeds of the divestment to be disbursed in the
following order:
(i) The payment of any taxes and assessments due;
(ii) The payment of court costs related to the action or actions
commenced under the Foreign-owned Real Estate National Security Act;
(iii) The payment of authorized costs of the sale, including all
approved fees and pending sale expenses and expenses of the referee;
(iv) Reimbursement of investigation and litigation costs and
expenses, in an amount approved by the court, to the Attorney General or
retained outside counsel;
(v) Payment to bona fide lienholders of the real estate, in order of
lien priority, except for liens which under the terms of the divestment
are to remain on the real estate; and
(vi) Remittance of any remaining proceeds to the State Treasurer for
distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the
Constitution of Nebraska.
(8) If the interest is a lease, easement, or interest other than fee
title, the court shall have power to declare such interest terminated.
(9) If the respondent fails to answer or appear for the action
commenced pursuant to this section, the court may enter default judgment.
(10) This section shall not apply to a property interest held or a
person or entity holding a property interest pursuant to section 3 of
this act. A property interest held or a person or entity holding a
property interest pursuant to section 3 of this act shall not be in
violation of or in continuing violation of the Foreign-owned Real Estate
National Security Act.
Sec. 3. (1) No person or entity who acquired title to, leased, as
either lessor or lessee, purchased, took, acquired by devise or descent,
or otherwise acquired any property interest shall have such property
interest voided, held invalid, subject to divestiture, or otherwise be
subject to the Foreign-owned Real Estate National Security Act if such
-5-

LB476 LB476
2025 2025
person or entity:
(a) Acquired the property interest while present in the United
States as a class of alien authorized to accept employment pursuant to 8
C.F.R. 274a.12; or
(b) Acquired the property interest and at any time subsequent to
such acquisition does not meet the definition of a nonresident alien.
(2) A property interest held or acquired while the holder of the
property interest did not meet the definition of a nonresident alien, or
acquired pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, is not and shall not
subsequently be subject to the Foreign-owned Real Estate National
Security Act, including any provision that would void, hold invalid, or
divest the holder of the property interest, for as long as such holder
retains such interest regardless of whether at any time in the future
such holder meets the definition of nonresident alien.
(3) This section shall not apply to a restricted entity, or their
agent, trustee, or fiduciary thereof.
Sec. 4. Original sections 76-3701 and 76-3712, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-6-